Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.110

Authority of secretary.

The secretary, in consultation with the committee, may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to implement this chapter, including rules:

(1) Establishing continuing competency as a condition of license or certification renewal;

(2) Establishing standards for delegation and supervision of licensed assistant behavior analysts and certified behavior technicians; and

(3) Defining the tasks that a certified behavior technician may perform.

[ 2015 c 118 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.